Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska28-3,105
Determination of probable postfertilization
age of unborn child; physician; duties.

(1) Except in the case of a medical emergency
which prevents compliance with this section, no abortion shall be performed
or induced or be attempted to be performed or induced unless the physician
performing or inducing it has first made a determination of the probable postfertilization
age of the unborn child or relied upon such a determination made by another
physician. In making such a determination, a physician shall make such inquiries
of the woman and perform or cause to be performed such medical examinations
and tests as a reasonably prudent physician, knowledgeable about the case
and the medical conditions involved, would consider necessary to perform in
making an accurate diagnosis with respect to postfertilization age.

(2) Failure
by any physician to conform to any requirement of this section constitutes
unprofessional conduct pursuant to section 38-2021.

Laws 2010, LB1103, § 4.